Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1104.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 206. (1) A licensee may surrender a license issued under this article by delivering to the director the license and a written notice stating that the licensee surrenders the license. (2) The surrender of a license under this section does not affect the licensee's civil or criminal liability for acts committed before the surrender of the license. (3) The surrender of a license under this section does not impair or affect the obligation of any preexisting lawful contract between the licensee and a consumer.